Tennessee, session 114, SB2471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-8-106(b), is amended by deleting
"ten (10)" and substituting "ten (10) business".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2471
012686
- 1 -